Utah statutes.
41-6a-1112.   Bicycles and mopeds -- Carrying bundle -- One hand on
handlebars.
(1)  A person operating a bicycle or moped may not carry any package, bundle,
or article which prevents the use of both hands in the control and operation
of the bicycle or moped.
(2)  A person operating a bicycle or moped shall keep at least one hand on the
handlebars at all times.
